Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-553
Attorney General; representation of board.

The Attorney General shall render to the Abstracters Board of Examiners opinions on all questions of law relating to the interpretation of the Abstracters Act or arising in its administration and shall act as attorney for the board in all actions and proceedings brought by or against it pursuant to the Abstracters Act.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 6, p. 1439;

Laws 1967, c. 481, § 1, p. 1492;

Laws 1969, c. 615, § 7, p. 2497;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-514;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 23.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).